Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1543.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 4(a)(1) of the act of October 24, 2012 (P.L.1209, No.151), known as the Child Labor Act, is amended by adding a subparagraph to read:Section 4. Occupations and establishments.(a) Prohibition.--Minors may not be employed in the following:(1) Establishments where alcoholic beverages are produced, sold or dispensed except as follows:* * *(v) A minor 15 years of age or older may be employed by an organization established as a nonprofit organization under 26 U.S.C. § 501(c)(3) (relating to 1234567891011121314151617181920 exemption from tax on corporations, certain trusts, etc.), operating in a city of the second class or a county of the second class and providing educational programming designed to provide culinary and life skills, together with support services and resources, to criminal-justice-system-involved juveniles and young adults where alcoholic beverages are served if the employment consists of serving food, clearing tables and related duties, provided that the minor's duties do not include dispensing or serving alcoholic beverages.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1543PN1814 - 2 - 123456789101112